New York, session 2025-2026, A4778.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 41.34 of the mental hygiene law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision (g) to read as follows: 3 (g) Upon the establishment of a community residential facility for the 4 disabled by a sponsoring agency, the state comptroller shall reimburse a 5 municipality for loss of real property tax revenue resulting from the 6 establishment of such facility. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01822-01-5